Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 34. Apportionment of State Representatives
§ 1893b.
House of representatives Districts

Notwithstanding the processes outlined in 17 V.S.A. chapter 34A regarding the enactment of initial districts and the subdivision of initial districts, for the 2022 reapportionment of the House of Representatives, the State is divided into the following districts for the House of Representatives, each of which shall be entitled to the indicated number of Representatives:
